Massachusetts, session 194th, H3838.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 12 of chapter 156C of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after subsection (d) the following subsection:-
(e) If one or more of the authorized persons is a United States Veteran, as defined in
clause Forty-third of section 7 of chapter 4 and upon presentation of evidence deemed
satisfactory by the secretary of state, the fee for filing of the certificate of organization required
by subsection (a) and the fee for the filing of the annual report required by subsection (c) shall be
waived.
of 1